Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Career and technical levy. deleted text begin (a) For fiscal year 2014 only, a district may levy an amount not more than the product of its career and technical revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of its adjusted net tax capacity per adjusted pupil unit in the fiscal year in which the levy is certified to the career and technical revenue equalizing factor. The career and technical revenue equalizing factor for fiscal year 2014 equals $7,612. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) For fiscal year 2015 and later,deleted text end A district may levy an amount not more than the product of its career and technical revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of its adjusted net tax capacity per adjusted pupil unit in the fiscal year in which the levy is certified to the career and technical revenue equalizing factor. The career and technical revenue equalizing factor deleted text begin for fiscal year 2015 and laterdeleted text end equals $7,612. Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.4531, subdivision 3a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02344 124D.4531 CAREER AND TECHNICAL REVENUE. Subd. 3a. Revenue adjustments. Notwithstanding subdivisions 1, 1a, and 3, for taxes payable in 2012 to 2014 only, the department must calculate the career and technical revenue for each district according to Minnesota Statutes 2010, section 124D.4531, and adjust the revenue for each district proportionately to meet the statewide revenue target under subdivision 1, paragraph (c). For purposes of calculating the revenue guarantee under subdivision 3, the career and technical education revenue for the previous fiscal year is the revenue according to Minnesota Statutes 2010, section 124D.4531, before adjustments to meet the statewide revenue target.